ko: 바이포드 장착 인터페이스: 아카 스위스/RRS 도브테일; 배럴 클램프; 키모드; M-LOK; 피카티니 레일(1913); 슬링 스위블 스터드; UIT/안슈츠 레일; 범용 클램프; 위버 레일; 기타
el: Διεπαφή τοποθέτησης δίποδα: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Σφιγκτήρας κάννης; KeyMod; M-LOK; Ράγα Picatinny (1913); Βάση αορτηριούχου (Sling swivel stud); Ράγα UIT / Anschutz; Σφιγκτήρας γενικής χρήσης; Ράγα Weaver; Άλλο
tr: Bipod montaj arayüzü: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Namlu kelepçesi; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny rayı (1913); Askı kayışı pimi; UIT / Anschutz rayı; Evrensel kelepçe; Weaver rayı; Diğer
th: อินเทอร์เฟซจุดยึดสำหรับขาตั้งสองขา: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; แคลมป์ยึดลำกล้อง; KeyMod; M-LOK; ราง Picatinny (1913); หมุดยึดสายสะพาย; ราง UIT / Anschutz; แคลมป์อเนกประสงค์; ราง Weaver; อื่นๆ
sv: Gränssnitt för montering av bipod: Arca-Swiss/RRS Dovetail; Pipfäste; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinnyskena (1913); Rembygelfäste; UIT/Anschutz-skena; Universalklämma; Weaverskena; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vmesnik za pritrditev dvonožca: Arca-Swiss / RRS; Sponka za cev; KeyMod; M-LOK; Letev Picatinny (1913); Zatič za jermen; Letev UIT / Anschutz; Univerzalna sponka; Letev Weaver; Drugo
es: Interfaz de montaje del bípode: Arca-Swiss/cola de milano RRS; Abrazadera de cañón; KeyMod; M-LOK; Riel Picatinny (1913); Perno de la anilla portafusil; Riel UIT/Anschutz; Abrazadera universal; Riel Weaver; Otro
vi: Giao diện gắn chân chống: Đuôi én Arca-Swiss / RRS; Kẹp nòng; KeyMod; M-LOK; Ray Picatinny (1913); Chốt đai đeo; Ray UIT / Anschutz; Kẹp đa năng; Ray Weaver; Khác
sk-SK: Rozhranie pre montáž dvojnožky: Arca-Swiss/RRS Dovetail; Svorka na hlaveň; KeyMod; M-LOK; Lišta Picatinny (1913); Uchytenie na čap pútka remeňa; Lišta UIT/Anschutz; Univerzálna svorka; Lišta Weaver; Iné
ja: バイポッド取り付けインターフェース: アルカスイス / RRS ダブテール; バレルクランプ; KeyMod; M-LOK; ピカティニーレール (1913); スリングスイベルスタッド; UIT / アンシュッツレール; ユニバーサルクランプ; ウィーバーレール; その他
de: Montageschnittstelle des Zweibeins: Arca-Swiss / RRS Schwalbenschwanz; Laufklemmung; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-Schiene (1913); Riemenbügelöse; UIT- / Anschütz-Schiene; Universalklemme; Weaver-Schiene; Sonstige
ro-RO: Interfață de montare a suportului cu două picioare: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Clemă pentru țeavă; KeyMod; M-LOK; Șină Picatinny (1913); Inel de prindere curea; Șină UIT / Anschutz; Clemă universală; Șină Weaver; Altele
lt-LT: Dvikojės atramos montavimo sąsaja: „Arca-Swiss“ / „RRS Dovetail“; Vamzdžio spaustukas; „KeyMod“; „M-LOK“; „Picatinny“ bėgelis (1913); Diržo kilpos varžtas; UIT / „Anschutz“ bėgelis; Universalus spaustukas; „Weaver“ bėgelis; Kita
en: Bipod mounting interface: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Barrel clamp; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny rail (1913); Sling swivel stud; UIT / Anschutz rail; Universal clamp; Weaver rail; Other
nl: Bipod montage interface: Arca-Swiss / RRS-zwaluwstaart; Loopklem; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-rail (1913); Riembeugelbout; UIT / Anschutz-rail; Universele klem; Weaver-rail; Anders
it: Interfaccia per montaggio bipiede: Arca-Swiss/RRS a coda di rondine; Morsetto da canna; KeyMod; M-LOK; Slitta Picatinny (1913); Perno per maglietta portacinghia; Slitta UIT/Anschütz; Morsetto universale; Slitta Weaver; Altro
pt-BR: Interface de montagem para bipé: Cauda de andorinha Arca-Swiss/RRS; Braçadeira de cano; KeyMod; M-LOK; Trilho Picatinny (1913); Pino giratório para bandoleira; Trilho UIT/Anschutz; Braçadeira universal; Trilho Weaver; Outro
nb: Grensesnitt for montering av tofot: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Løpsklemme; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-skinne (1913); Remfesteskrue; UIT- / Anschutz-skinne; Universalklemme; Weaver-skinne; Annet
bg-BG: Интерфейс за монтаж на двунога опора: Arca-Swiss / RRS тип лястовича опашка; Скоба за цев; KeyMod; M-LOK; Релса Picatinny (1913); Болт за ремък; Релса UIT / Anschutz; Универсална скоба; Релса Weaver; Други
hu: Kétlábú támasz rögzítési felülete: Arca-Swiss / RRS fecskefarok; Csőbilincs; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny sín (1913); Szíjkarika csap; UIT / Anschütz sín; Univerzális bilincs; Weaver sín; Egyéb
pt-PT: Interface de montagem do bipé: Arca-Swiss/cauda de andorinha RRS; Grampo de cano; KeyMod; M-LOK; Calha Picatinny (1913); Pino giratório de bandoleira; Calha UIT/Anschutz; Grampo universal; Calha Weaver; Outros
hr-HR: Sustav montaže bipoda: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Stezaljka za cijev; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny šina (1913); Klin za remen (Sling swivel); UIT / Anschutz šina; Univerzalna stezaljka; Weaver šina; Ostalo
pl: Interfejs montażu dwójnogu: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Zacisk na lufę; KeyMod; M-LOK; Szyna Picatinny (1913); Bączek na pasek; Szyna UIT / Anschutz; Zacisk uniwersalny; Szyna Weaver; Inne
zh-TW: 腳架安裝介面: Arca-Swiss / RRS 燕尾槽; 槍管夾具; KeyMod; M-LOK; 皮卡汀尼導軌 (1913); 槍背帶旋轉鈕; UIT / Anschutz 導軌; 通用夾具; Weaver 導軌; 其他
cs: Rozhraní pro montáž dvojnožky (bipodu): Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Objímka na hlaveň; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny lišta (1913); Čep poutka řemenu; Lišta UIT / Anschütz; Univerzální svorka; Lišta Weaver; Jiné
ru: Интерфейс крепления сошки: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Крепление на ствол; KeyMod; M-LOK; Планка Пикатинни (1913); Антабка; Планка UIT / Anschütz; Универсальный зажим; Планка Вивера; Другое
fi: Bipodin kiinnitysliitäntä: Arca-Swiss / RRS Dovetail; Piippukiinnike; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-kisko (1913); Hihnalenkkinasta; UIT / Anschutz -kisko; Yleismallinen puristin; Weaver-kisko; Muu
da: Monteringsflade til tobenet stativ: Arca-Swiss / RRS svalehalenot; Løbsklemme; KeyMod; M-LOK; Picatinny-skinne (1913); Rembøjletap; UIT / Anschutz-skinne; Universalklemme; Weaver-skinne; Andet
fr: Interface de fixation du bipied: Arca-Swiss / RRS en queue d'aronde; Collier de canon; KeyMod; M-LOK; Rail Picatinny (1913); Boulon d'attache-bretelle; Rail UIT / Anschutz; Pince universelle; Rail Weaver; Autre
zh-CN: 两脚架安装接口: 阿卡/RRS 燕尾槽; 枪管夹; KeyMod; M-LOK; 皮卡汀尼导轨 (1913); 枪带环螺柱; UIT / 安许茨导轨; 通用夹钳; 韦弗导轨; 其他